Illinois, session 104th, HB1450.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Sections 5.1030 and 6z-144 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)7    Sec. 5.1030. The Illinois Graduate and Retain Our 8Workforce (iGROW) Tech Scholarship Fund. 9    (30 ILCS 105/6z-144 new)10    Sec. 6z-144. The Illinois Graduate and Retain Our 11Workforce (iGROW) Tech Scholarship Checkoff Fund; creation. 12The Illinois Graduate and Retain Our Workforce (iGROW) Tech 13Scholarship Checkoff Fund is hereby created as a special fund 14in the State treasury. Subject to the appropriation of new 15moneys made available from the income tax checkoff created 16under Section 507MMM of the Illinois Income Tax Act, moneys in 17the Fund shall be used by the Illinois Student Assistance 18Commission for the purpose of awarding scholarships pursuant 19to Section 65.120 of the Higher Education Student Assistance 20Act. 21    Section 10. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by   HB1450- 2 -LRB104 06934 HLH 16971 b1adding Section 507MMM as follows: 2    (35 ILCS 5/507MMM new)3    Sec. 507MMM. Illinois Graduate and Retain Our Workforce 4(iGROW) Tech Scholarship Fund checkoff. For taxable years 5ending on or after December 31, 2025, the Department must 6print on its standard individual income tax form a provision 7(i) indicating that if the taxpayer wishes to contribute to 8Illinois Graduate and Retain Our Workforce (iGROW) Tech 9Scholarship Fund checkoff, as authorized by this amendatory 10Act of the 104th General Assembly, he or she may do so by 11stating the amount of the contribution (not less than $1) on 12the return and (ii) stating that the contribution will reduce 13the taxpayer's refund or increase the amount of payment to 14accompany the return. Failure to remit any amount of increased 15payment shall reduce the contribution accordingly. This 16Section does not apply to any amended return. 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.